hu: Ernyő formája: Hatszögletű; Nyolcszögű; Téglalap; Kerek; Négyzet; Egyéb
fr: Forme de l’auvent: Hexagonal; Octogonal; Rectangulaire; Rond; Carré; Autre
cs: Tvar přístřešku: Šestiúhelníkové; Osmiúhelníkové; Obdélníkové; Kulaté; Čtvercové; Jiné
bg-BG: Форма на сенника: Шестоъгълно; Осмоъгълно; Правоъгълно; Кръгло; Квадратно; Друго
tr: Kanopi şekli: Altıgen; Sekizgen; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Diğer
en: Canopy shape: Hexagonal; Octagonal; Rectangular; Round; Square; Other
sl-SI: Oblika nadstreška: Šestkoten; Osemkotna; Pravokotno; Okrogel; Kvadratna; Druga
nb: Markisens/parasollens form: Heksagonal; Oktagonal; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkantet; Annet
th: รูปทรงของหลังคา: หกเหลี่ยม; แปดเหลี่ยม; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Forma copertinei: Hexagonal; Octogonal; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Pătrat; Altele
sv: Form på baldakin: Hexagonal; Oktagonal; Rektangulär; Rund; Fyrkantig; Övrigt
zh-CN: 遮蓬形状: 六角形; 八角形; 矩形; 圆形; 方形; 其他
ja: キャノピーの形状: 六角形; 八角形; 長方形; ラウンド; スクエア; その他
pt-BR: Formato do dossel: Hexagonal; Octogonal; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
nl: Vorm van canopy: Zeshoekig; Achthoekig; Rechthoekig; Rond; Vierkant; Overig
hr-HR: Oblik nadstrešnice: Šesterokutni; Osmerokutni; Pravokutni; Okrugla; Kvadratno; Ostalo
ru: Форма купола: Шестигранный; Восьмигранный; Прямоугольный; Круглый; Квадратный; Другой
it: Forma della tenda: Esagonale; Ottagonale; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Quadrato; Altro
ko: 캐노피 형태: 육방정계; 팔각형; 직사각형; 라운드; 스퀘어; 기타
el: Σχήμα σκέπαστρου: Εξαγωνικό; Οκταγωνικό; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Forma da tenda para jardim: Hexagonal; Octogonal; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
da: Baldakinform: Sekskantet; Ottekantet; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkant; Andet
zh-TW: 遮陽篷形狀: 六角形; 八角形; 長方形; 圓形; 方形; 其他
fi: Kuomun muoto: Kuusikulmainen; Kahdeksankulmainen; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen; Muu
lt-LT: Stogelio forma: Šešiakampis; Aštuonkampis; Stačiakampis; Apvali; Kvadratinė; Kita
vi: Hình dạng mái che: Lục phương; Bát giác; Chữ nhật; Tròn; Vuông; Khác
pl: Kształt baldachimu: Sześciokątny; Ośmiokątny; Prostokątne; Okrągłe; Kwadratowe; Pozostałe
de: Pavillonform: Sechseckig; Achteckig; Rechteckig; Kreis; Quadrat; Sonstiges
es: Forma del toldo: Hexagonal; Octagonal; Rectangular; Redondo; Cuadrado; Otros
sk-SK: Tvar striešky: Šesťhranný; Osemhranný; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Hranatý; Iné